src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


!! # Inari Saami number <-> text


LEXICON num  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Num: numsg ;

LEXICON numsg  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Sg+Acc: K ;
+Sg+Gen: K ;



LEXICON KYEHTI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@U.Case.SgNom@+Num+Sg+Nom:@U.Case.SgNom@ K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Acc:@U.Case.SgGen@ K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Gen:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !oovtâ K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !oovtâ K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !oovtâ K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill:@U.Case.SgGen@^EA^RLEN%>n K ; ! oohtân K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN%>st K ; ! oovtâst K ;
@U.Case.SgCom@+Num+Sg+Com:@U.Case.SgCom@^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>in K ; !   neljijn
@U.Case.Ess@+Num+Ess:@U.Case.Ess@%>n  K ; ! ohtân	 K ;
@U.Case.PlNom@+Num+Pl+Nom:@U.Case.PlNom@^WG^RLEN%>h K ; !oovtah K ;
@U.Case.PlAcc@+Num+Pl+Acc:@U.Case.PlAcc@^WG^RLEN%>id K ; !oovtâid K ;
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Gen:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG^RLEN%>i K ; !oovtâi K ;
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Gen:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG^RVSH%>i K ; !oovtâi K ;
@U.Case.PlIll@+Num+Pl+Ill:@U.Case.PlIll@^WG^CLEN^RVSH%>id K ; !ovttáid K ;
@U.Case.PlLoc@+Num+Pl+Loc:@U.Case.PlLoc@^WG^RLEN%>in K ; !oovtâin K ;
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Com:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG^RVSH%>iguin K ; !ovtâiguin K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Cmp/SgGen:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;



@U.Case.SgNom@lov:@U.Case.SgNom@lov ONES ;
@U.Case.PlNom@loveh:@U.Case.PlNom@loveh ONES ;
@U.Case.SgGen@lov:@U.Case.SgGen@lov ONES ;
@U.Case.PlGen@luvij:@U.Case.PlGen@luvij ONES ;
@U.Case.PlIll@luvvijd:@U.Case.PlIll@luvvijd ONES ;
@U.Case.PlLoc@luvvijn:@U.Case.PlLoc@luvvijn ONES ;
@U.Case.SgCom@luvvijn:@U.Case.SgCom@luvvijn ONES ;
@U.Case.Ess@:lovveen@U.Case.Ess@lovveen ONES ;

LEXICON OHTA  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@U.Case.SgNom@+Num+Sg+Nom:@U.Case.SgNom@ K ; ! ohtâ
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Acc:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Acc:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Cmp/SgGen:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
@U.Case.SgCom@+Num+Sg+Com:@U.Case.SgCom@^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>in K ; !  ovttáin  
@U.Case.PlIll@+Num+Pl+Ill:@U.Case.PlIll@^WG^CLEN^SVLOW%>id K ; !ovttáid  
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Gen:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ  
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ   oovtâ kistui
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ  oovtâ kistust
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill:@U.Case.SgGen@^CSH^RLEN%>n K ; ! kuulmân  
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN%>st K ; ! kuulmâst 
@U.Case.Ess@+Num+Ess:@U.Case.Ess@%>n  K ; ! vittân	 
@U.Case.PlNom@+Num+Pl+Nom:@U.Case.PlNom@^WG^RLEN%>h K ; !viiđah 
@U.Case.PlAcc@+Num+Pl+Acc:@U.Case.PlAcc@^WG^RLEN%>id K ; ! viiđâid  
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Gen:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG^RLEN%>i K ; !viiđâi  
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG%>i K ; !viđâi  
@U.Case.PlLoc@+Num+Pl+Loc:@U.Case.PlLoc@^WG^RLEN%>in K ; !viiđâin  
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Com:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG%>iguin K ; !viđâiguin  
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Cmp/SgGen:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;


LEXICON KULMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@** maaŋgâi
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Acc:@U.Case.SgGen@ K ; !kulmâ
@U.Case.SgCom@+Num+Sg+Com:@U.Case.SgCom@^WG^SVLOW%>in K ; !  ovttáin  
@U.Case.PlIll@+Num+Pl+Ill:@U.Case.PlIll@^WG^SVLOW%>id K ; !ovttáid  
KULMA_VITTA ;

LEXICON VITTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Acc:@U.Case.SgGen@ K ; !vittâ
@U.Case.SgCom@+Num+Sg+Com:@U.Case.SgCom@^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>in K ; !  viiđáin  
@U.Case.PlIll@+Num+Pl+Ill:@U.Case.PlIll@^WG^RLEN^SVLOW%>id K ; !viiđáid  
KULMA_VITTA ;

LEXICON KULMA_VITTA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
@U.Case.SgNom@+Num+Sg+Nom:@U.Case.SgNom@ K ; !vittâ
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Gen:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ  
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ   oovtâ kistui
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN K ; !kuulmâ  oovtâ kistust
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill:@U.Case.SgGen@^CSH^RLEN%>n K ; ! kuulmân  
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN%>st K ; ! kuulmâst 
@U.Case.Ess@+Num+Ess:@U.Case.Ess@%>n  K ; ! vittân	 
@U.Case.PlNom@+Num+Pl+Nom:@U.Case.PlNom@^WG^RLEN%>h K ; !viiđah 
@U.Case.PlAcc@+Num+Pl+Acc:@U.Case.PlAcc@^WG^RLEN%>id K ; ! viiđâid  
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Gen:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG^RLEN%>i K ; !viiđâi  
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG%>i K ; !viđâi  
@U.Case.PlLoc@+Num+Pl+Loc:@U.Case.PlLoc@^WG^RLEN%>in K ; !viiđâin  
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Com:@U.Case.PlGen@^WG%>iguin K ; !viđâiguin  
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Cmp/SgGen:@U.Case.SgGen@^WG^RLEN NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;



LEXICON CICCAM  !!≈ * **@CODE@** to be checked
@U.Case.SgNom@+Num+Sg+Nom:@U.Case.SgNom@ K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Acc:@U.Case.SgGen@ K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Gen:@U.Case.SgGen@ K ; !čiččâm K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@ K ; !čiččâm K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:@U.Case.SgGen@ K ; !čiččâm K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Ill:@U.Case.SgGen@%>ân K ; ! oohtân K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Sg+Loc:@U.Case.SgGen@i%>st K ; ! oovtâst K ;
@U.Case.SgCom@+Num+Sg+Com:@U.Case.SgCom@á%>in K ; !  ovttáin K ;
@U.Case.Ess@+Num+Ess:@U.Case.Ess@i%>n  K ; ! ohtân	 K ;
@U.Case.PlNom@+Num+Pl+Nom:@U.Case.PlNom@e%>h K ; !oovtah K ;
@U.Case.PlAcc@+Num+Pl+Acc:@U.Case.PlAcc@i%>id K ; !oovtâid K ;
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Gen:@U.Case.PlGen@i%>i K ; !oovtâi K ;
@U.Case.PlIll@+Num+Pl+Ill:@U.Case.PlIll@á%>id K ; !ovttáid K ;
@U.Case.PlLoc@+Num+Pl+Loc:@U.Case.PlLoc@á%>in K ; !oovtâin K ;
@U.Case.PlGen@+Num+Pl+Com:@U.Case.PlGen@i%>iguin K ; !ovtâiguin K ;
@U.Case.SgGen@+Num+Cmp/SgGen:@U.Case.SgGen@%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;


!LEXICON iLOV   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
!+Num+Sg+Nom:lov K ; !love kyehtlov
!+Num+Sg+Acc:lov K ; !love kyehtlov
!+Num+Sg+Gen:i6^WG%>lov K ; !love K ; kyehtlov
!+Num+Cmp/SgGen:i6^WG%>lov%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
!+Num+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:i6^WG%>lová%>n K ; ! lován K ;
!+Num+Sg+Ill:i6^WG^RLEN%>lohá%>n K ; ! kyevtlohán K ; kyevtlohán
!+Num+Sg+Loc:i6^WG^RLEN%>lovve%>est K ; ! lovveest K ; kyevtlovveest
!+Num+Sg+Abe:i6^WG%>love%>ttáá K ; ! lovettáá K ; kyevtlovettáá
!+Num+Sg+Com:i^WG^CLEN%>inluvvi%>jn K ; !   luvvijn kuovttijnluvvijn
!+Num+Ess:in%>lovve%>en  K ; ! lovveen	 K ; kyehtinlovveen
!+Num+Pl+Nom:i^WGh%>love%>h K ; !loveh K ; kyevtihloveh
!+Num+Pl+Acc:i^WG%>idluuvi%>jd K ; !luuvijd K ; kuovtijdluuvijd
!+Num+Pl+Gen:i^WG%>iluvi%>j K ; !luvij K ; kuovtijluvij
!+Num+Pl+Com:i^WG%>iluvi%>jguin K ; !luvijguin K ; kuovtijluvijguin
!+Num+Pl+Abe:i^WG%>iluvi%>jttáá K ; !luvijttáá K ; kuovtijluvijttáá
!+Num+Pl+Ill:i^WG^CLEN%>idluvvi%>jd K ; !luvvijd K ; kuovttijdluvvijd
!+Num+Pl+Loc:i^WG%>inluuvi%>jn K ; !luuvijn K ; kuovtijnluuvijn
